Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2106
Application; report of change; amendments.

(1) A contractor shall report to the commissioner any change in the information originally reported on or with the application under section 48-2105 within fifteen days of the change, except that the contractor shall notify the commissioner of changes in workers' compensation insurance coverage at least ten days prior to any change in coverage.

(2) After the time specified in subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner, with good cause shown, may determine that amendments may be made to correct an application.

(3) Amendments to applications shall not be permitted when a change occurs in the business classification such as a change from a sole proprietorship to a corporation.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 6.